Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,167
Ordinances governing body art; authorized.

The licensure of persons performing body art or operating a body art facility under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act shall not be construed to restrict or prohibit a governing body of a county, city, or village from providing further requirements for performing body art or operating a body art facility within its jurisdiction under ordinances at least as stringent as, or more stringent than, the regulations of the act.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 36;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-3,238;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 429.